Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.180

Retirement of officers.

Commissioned officers of the organized militia of Washington shall be retired by order of the commander-in-chief with the rank respectively held by them at the time of such retirement for the following reasons:

(1) Unfitness for military service by reason of permanent physical disability.

(2) Upon request after at least five years continuous service as an officer in the organized militia of Washington.

Except as provided otherwise in RCW 38.16.015(2), commissioned officers of the state guard shall upon reaching the age of sixty-four years be retired.

Retired officers shall draw no pay or allowance from the state unless recalled to service.

Retired officers are subject, with their consent, to temporary detail on active state service by the commander-in-chief, and while on such duty shall receive the same pay and allowances as officers of like rank on the active list.

[ 2012 c 12 s 2; 1989 c 19 s 21; 1984 c 198 s 2; 1943 c 130 s 33; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-33. Prior: 1909 c 134 s 40; 1895 c 108 s 66.]